Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB543.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 217 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible facility" means an institution operating under Federalwide
Assurance for the Protection of Human Subjects in accordance with 45
C.F.R. pt. 46 and 42 U.S.C. sec. 289(a);
(b) "Eligible patient" means an individual who has:
1. A life-threatening or severely debilitating illness as attested by the
patient's treating physician;
2. In consultation with the patient's treating physician, considered all
other treatment options currently approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration;
3. Received a recommendation from the patient's treating physician for
the use of an individualized investigational drug, biological product,
or device for treatment of the life-threatening or severely debilitating
illness;
4. a. Provided written informed consent to the use of the
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device
for treatment of the life-threatening or severely debilitating
illness; or
b. If the individual is a minor or is otherwise incapable of providing
informed consent, the parent or legal guardian has given
informed consent in writing to the use of the individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device; and
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1954
5. Documentation from the patient's treating physician that the
individual meets all the criteria for an eligible patient, including an
attestation from the treating physician that the treating physician was
consulted in the creation of the written, informed consent required
under this section;
(c) "Individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device" means a
drug, biological product, or device that is unique and produced exclusively
for use for an individual patient, based on the patient's own genetic profile,
including individualized gene therapy antisense oligonucleotides and
individualized neoantigen vaccines;
(d) "Institution" has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. sec. 46.102(f);
(e) "Life-threatening or severely debilitating illness" has the same meaning as
"life-threating" and "severely debilitating" in 21 C.F.R. sec. 312.81; and
(f) "Written, informed consent" means a written document that:
1. Is signed by:
a. An eligible patient;
b. If the patient is a minor, by a parent or legal guardian; or
c. If the patient is incapacitated, by a designated health care agent
pursuant to a health care power of attorney; and
2. Includes the following:
a. An explanation of the currently approved products and
treatments for the eligible patient's life-threatening or severely
debilitating illness;
b. An attestation that the eligible patient concurs with the treating
physician in believing that all currently approved treatments are
unlikely to prolong the eligible patient's life;
c. Clear identification of the specific individualized investigational
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1954
drug, biological product, or device proposed for treatment of the
eligible patient's terminal illness;
d. A description of the potentially best and worst outcomes resulting
from use of the individualized investigational drug, biological
product, or device to treat the eligible patient's life-threatening
or severely debilitating illness, along with a realistic description
of the most likely outcome. The description shall be based on the
treating physician's knowledge of the proposed treatment in
conjunction with an awareness of the eligible patient's life-
threatening or severely debilitating illness and shall include a
statement acknowledging that new, unanticipated, different, or
worse symptoms might result from, and that death could be
hastened by, the proposed treatment;
e. A statement that eligibility for hospice care may be withdrawn if
the eligible patient begins treatment of the life-threatening or
severely debilitating illness with an individualized investigational
drug, biological product, or device and that hospice care may be
reinstated if such treatment ends and the eligible patient meets
hospice eligibility requirements;
f. A statement that the eligible patient's health benefit plan or
third-party administrator and provider are not obligated to pay
for any care or treatments consequent to the use of the
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device,
unless specifically required to do so by law or contract;
g. A statement that the eligible patient understands that he or she is
liable for all expenses consequent to the use of the individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device and that this
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1954
liability extends to the eligible patient's estate, unless a contract
between the patient and the manufacturer of the drug, biological
product, or device states otherwise; and
h. A statement that the eligible patient or, for an eligible patient
who is a minor or lacks capacity to provide informed consent,
that the parent or legal guardian consents to the use of the
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device
for treatment of the life-threatening or severely debilitating
illness.
(2) (a) A manufacturer operating within an eligible facility in accordance with all
applicable federal laws may make available to an eligible patient, and an
eligible patient may request, the manufacturer's individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device from an eligible facility
or manufacturer operating within an eligible facility.
(b) A manufacturer of an individualized investigational drug, biological
product, or device may:
1. Provide the individualized investigational drug, biological product, or
device to an eligible patient without receiving compensation; or
2. Require the eligible patient to pay the costs of, or the costs associated
with, the manufacture of the individualized investigational drug,
biological product, or device.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a manufacturer of
an individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device to make
the individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device
available to an eligible patient.
(3) If an eligible patient dies while being treated with an individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device, the eligible patient's heirs
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1954
shall not be liable for any outstanding debt related to the treatment, including any
costs attributed to lack of insurance coverage for the treatment.
(4) (a) A licensing board shall not revoke, fail to renew, suspend, or take any other
disciplinary action against a health care provider licensed in Kentucky
based solely on the health care provider's recommendations to an eligible
patient regarding access to or treatment with an individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device.
(b) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall not take action against a
health care provider's Medicare or Medicaid certification based solely on
the health care provider's recommendation that a patient have access to an
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device.
(5) (a) An official, employee, or agent of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not
block or attempt to block an eligible patient's access to an individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device.
(b) Counseling, advice, or a recommendation consistent with medical standards
of care from a licensed health care provider or denial of coverage by the
Kentucky Medicaid program shall not constitute a violation of this
subsection.
(6) A private right of action may not be brought against a manufacturer of an
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device, or against any
other person or entity involved in the care of an eligible patient using an
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device, for any harm
caused to the eligible patient resulting from use of the individualized
investigational drug, biological product, or device as long as the manufacturer or
other person or entity has made a good-faith effort to comply with the provisions
of this section and has exercised reasonable care in actions undertaken in
accordance with this section.
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1954
(7) This section shall be not construed to:
(a) Expand the coverage required to be offered or provided by a health
insurance policy, plan, certificate, or contract;
(b) Affect any requirement for a health insurance policy, plan, certificate, or
contract to provide coverage for routine patient costs for patients involved in
approved cancer clinical trials;
(c) Require an insurer, third-party administrator, or governmental agency to
pay costs associated with the treatment of an eligible patient with an
individualized investigational drug, biological product, or device; or
(d) Require a hospital or health facility to provide new or additional services.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/2/2026 6:27 PM Jacketed